Arkansas, session 2025, HB1184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-39-502, concerning the definitions used
under the Fair Mortgage Lending Act, is amended to add additional
subdivisions to read as follows:
(26) "Consumer report" means the same as defined in the Fair
Mortgage Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq., as it existed on January 1,
2025; and
(27)(A) "Mortgage trigger lead" means a lead resulting from a
consumer report obtained under 15 U.S.C. § 1681b, as it existed on January 1,
2025, if the issuance of the consumer report is triggered by an inquiry made
with a consumer reporting agency in response to an application for credit.
(B) "Mortgage trigger lead" does not include a consumer
report obtained by a lender that holds or services existing indebtedness of
the applicant who is the subject of the consumer report.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-39-513, concerning prohibited practices
under the Fair Mortgage Lending Act, is amended to add an additional
*ANS070*
02-11-2025 09:34:02 ANS070

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 H2/11/25 HB1184
subdivision to read as follows:
(18) To use a mortgage trigger lead in a misleading or deceptive
manner by, including without limitation:
(A) Failing to state in the initial communication with a
consumer:
(i) The loan officer's name and the mortgage broker
or mortgage banker on behalf of whom the loan officer is acting;
(ii) A brief explanation of how the loan officer or
his or her sponsor obtained the consumer's contact information to make the
communication, or an explanation of a mortgage trigger lead;
(iii) That the solicitation is based on personal
information about the consumer that was purchased, directly or indirectly,
from a consumer reporting agency without the knowledge or permission of the
lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage banker with whom the consumer initially
applied;
(iv) That the loan officer and his or her sponsor is
not affiliated with the creditor to which the consumer made the credit
application that resulted in the mortgage trigger lead;
(v) That the purpose of the communication is to
solicit new business for the sponsor; and
(vi) To make a firm offer of credit as provided by
the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681b(e), as it existed on January
1, 2025;
(B) Soliciting or contacting a consumer who has opted out
of prescreened offers of credit under the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15
U.S.C. § 1681 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(C) Placing a telephone call to a consumer who has placed
his or her contact information on a national "Do-Not-Call" registry
established and maintained by the Federal Trade Commission under 16 C.F.R. §
310.4, as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(D) Knowingly using information from a mortgage trigger
lead in violation of this subdivision (18) or the Fair Credit Reporting Act,
15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025.
/s/L. Johnson


02-11-2025 09:34:02 ANS070